Utah statutes.
78B-15-506.   Costs of genetic testing.
(1)  Subject to assessment of costs under Part 6, Adjudication of Parentage,
the cost of initial genetic testing shall be advanced:
(a)  by a support-enforcement agency in a proceeding in which the support-
enforcement agency is providing services;
(b)  by the individual who made the request;
(c)  as agreed by the parties; or
(d)  as ordered by the tribunal.
(2)  In cases in which the cost is advanced by the support-enforcement agency,
the agency may seek reimbursement from a man who is rebuttably identified as
the father.
